Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.013

Canvassing.

"Canvassing" means the process of examining ballots or groups of ballots, subtotals, and cumulative totals in order to determine the official returns of a primary, special, or general election and includes the tabulation of any votes that were not previously tabulated.

[ 2013 c 11 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 2; 2003 c 111 s 103; 1990 c 59 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.01.008.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—1990 c 59: "By this act the legislature intends to unify and simplify the laws and procedures governing filing for elective office, ballot layout, ballot format, voting equipment, and canvassing." [ 1990 c 59 s 1.]

Effective date—1990 c 59: "Sections 1 through 6, 8 through 96, and 98 through 112 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992." [ 1990 c 59 s 113.]